Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2130.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Section 41-703, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE41-703. Duties of director The director shall: 1. Be directly responsible to the governor for the direction, control and operation of the department. 2. Provide assistance to the governor and legislature as requested. 3. Adopt rules the director deems necessary or desirable to further the objectives and programs of the department. 4. Formulate policies, plans and programs to effectuate the missions and purposes of the department. 5. Employ, determine the conditions of employment and prescribe the duties and powers of administrative, professional, technical, secretarial, clerical and other persons as may be necessary in the performance of the department's duties and contract for the services of outside advisors, consultants and aides as may be reasonably necessary. 6. Make contracts and incur obligations within the general scope of the department's activities and operations subject to the availability of monies. 7. Contract with or assist other departments, agencies and institutions of the state, local and federal governments in the furtherance of the department's purposes, objectives and programs. 8. Accept and disburse grants, gifts, donations, matching monies and direct payments from public or private agencies for the conduct of programs that are consistent with the overall purposes and objectives of the department. 9. Establish and maintain separate financial accounts as required by federal law or regulations. 10. Advise and make recommendations to the governor and the legislature on all matters concerning the department's objectives. 11. Delegate the administrative functions, duties and powers as the director deems necessary to carry out the efficient operation of the department. 12. As part of maintaining the department's personnel and financial data management systems, consult with the budget units of the legislature and ensure that the department's systems accommodate the personnel and financial policies of the legislature. The department shall accept reasonable requests from the legislature to modify the system and shall fulfill any requests in a timely manner. END_STATUTE